Utah statutes.
78B-11-105.    Effect of agreement to arbitrate -- Nonwaivable provisions.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsections (2) and (3), a party to an
agreement to arbitrate or to an arbitration proceeding may waive or, the
parties may vary the effect of, the requirements of this chapter to the extent
permitted by law.
(2)  Before a controversy arises that is subject to an agreement to arbitrate,
a party to the agreement may not:
(a)  waive or agree to vary the effect of the requirements of Subsection
78B-11-106(1), 78B-11-107(1), 78B-11-118(1) or (2), or Section 78B-11-109,
78B-11-127, or 78B-11-129;
(b)  agree to unreasonably restrict the right under Section 78B-11-110 to
notice of the initiation of an arbitration proceeding;
(c)  agree to unreasonably restrict the right under Section 78B-11-113 to
disclosure of any facts by a neutral arbitrator; or
(d)  waive the right under Section 78B-11-117 of a party to an agreement to
arbitrate to be represented by a lawyer at any proceeding or hearing under
this chapter, but an employer and a labor organization may waive the right to
representation by a lawyer in a labor arbitration.
(3)  A party to an agreement to arbitrate or arbitration proceeding may not
waive, or the parties may not vary the effect of, the requirements of this
section or Sections 78B-11-108, 78B-11-115, 78B-11-119, 78B-11-123 through
78B-11-125, 78B-11-130, Subsection 78B-11-104(1), 78B-11-121(3) or (4), or
78B-11-126(1) or (2).
